Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 4 Wyoming Girls' School

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 2, subsection 021, directs the department of audit through the school finance section, to conduct an audit of educational services provided at the Wyoming boys' school and the Wyoming girls' school, which is to include a review of funds made available for educational services at these institutions during school year 2004-2005, the educational services provided during this same period of time and recommendations for future funding and service levels. Audit findings are to be reported to the joint appropriations interim committee on or before December 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided in art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Cross references. —

As to general supervision and control by department of corrections over charitable, reformatory and penal institutions, see §

25-1-104

.

For constitutional provision as to establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to public health and safety relating to state institutions generally, see title 35.

Law reviews. —

For casenote, “Constitutional Law — Freedom of Speech: Public Employee — Can We Talk? The Wyoming Supreme Court Grants Little Protection to Public-Employee Whistleblowers. Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 625 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability for social service agency's negligence in placement, or supervision after placement, of children, 90 ALR3d 1214.

Constitutional right of prisoners to abortion services and facilities—federal cases, 90 ALR Fed 683.

43 C.J.S. Infants § 1 et seq.

§ 25-4-101.
Girls to be committed; terms; notification of superintendent; transportation to school.

Any girl who has attained the age of twelve (12) years and who has been ordered committed in compliance with W.S.

14-6-229

may be committed to the Wyoming girls’ school. The term of any girl committed shall be determined by the department of family services.

After a girl is committed to the girls’ school the clerk of court shall notify the superintendent of the institution. The superintendent shall arrange for the transportation of the girl to the girls’ school.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 156, §§ 6, 7; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-1006, 108-1007; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1407, 19-1408; Laws 1955, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-417, 9-418; Laws 1969, ch. 50, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-407, 9-6-408; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 217, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.

§ 25-4-102.
Nature of program and discipline; rules and regulations for work release, home visitation or temporary residence.

The program and discipline at the Wyoming girls’ school shall be educational, vocational and rehabilitative. For these purposes the department of family services shall adopt rules and regulations for work release for residents who are not subject to home visitation or temporary residence outside the school enclosure.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 156, §§ 8, 9; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-1008, 108-1009; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1409, 19-1410; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-419, 9-420; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-409, 9-6-410; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2014 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment

, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “W.S.

7-16-301

through

7-16-311

.”

§ 25-4-103.
Personal record to be prepared; rehabilitation plan; periodic review; additional contents of record; release from custody.

When a girl is admitted to the girls’ school, the superintendent shall prepare a record of the personal history of the resident, including her age, family and social background, education and prior training and employment. Based upon all pertinent information available, the superintendent shall prepare an individualized rehabilitation plan which shall be part of the resident’s record. Periodic reviews of the resident’s progress and appropriate modifications of her rehabilitation plan shall be made by the superintendent and entered on the resident’s record. The status of each resident shall be reported to her periodically. All orders affecting the resident, the circumstances of her final release and any new developments concerning her personal history shall be included in her record.

After the department of family services has made a finding that a girl should be released from the girls’ school, it shall give advance notification of the pending release to the court which ordered commitment. Upon the girl’s release the department shall issue her an administrative discharge.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 156, §§ 11, 12; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-1011, 108-1012; C.S. 1945, §§ 19-1412, 19-1413; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-422, 9-423; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-6-412, 9-6-413; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 217, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3.